Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,132
Abandonment of a domestication.

(MBCA 9.25) (a) Unless
otherwise provided in a plan of domestication of a domestic business corporation,
after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by sections 21-2,127
to 21-2,132, and at any time before the domestication has become effective,
it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

(b) If a domestication
is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles of charter
surrender have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the domestication
has become effective, a statement that the domestication has been abandoned
in accordance with this section, signed by an officer or other duly authorized
representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing prior
to the effective date of the domestication. The statement shall take effect
upon filing and the domestication shall be deemed abandoned and shall not
become effective.

(c)
If the domestication of a foreign business corporation in this state is abandoned
in accordance with the laws of the foreign jurisdiction after articles of
domestication have been filed with the Secretary of State, a statement that
the domestication has been abandoned, signed by an officer or other duly authorized
representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing. The
statement shall take effect upon filing and the domestication shall be deemed
abandoned and shall not become effective.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 132.
January 1, 2016